Massachusetts, session 194th, H528.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 74 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting after section 14B the following new section:-   
Section 14C. Each student of the culinary arts program shall be required to complete and 
receive the Massachusetts Department of Public Health’s food allergen certification as part of the 
completion of said program. The state board shall establish rules and regulations consistent with 
the implementation of this program.